Nebraska, session 109, LB1018.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1018 LB1018
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 49-1446.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
49-1446.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, no committee shall make
expenditures expend funds for the purchase or payment of:
(1) Clothes or medical or dental expenses of a candidate or the
members of his or her immediate family;
(2) Installment payments for an automobile owned by a candidate;
(3) Mortgage or rental payments for a permanent residence of a
candidate;
(4) The satisfaction of personal debts, including installment
payments on personal loans, except campaign loans subject to reporting
required by subsection (2) of section 49-1456;
(5) Personal services, including the services of a lawyer or
accountant, except campaign services subject to reporting pursuant to the
provisions of section 49-1455; or
(6) Office supplies, staff, or furnishings for the public office for
which an individual is a candidate for nomination or election except as
set out in subsection (2) of section 49-1446.01; .
(7) In the case of a ballot question committee, the purpose of
influencing or attempting to influence the action of voters in assistance
of or in opposition to the nomination or election of a candidate; or
(8) In the case of a candidate committee, goods, materials,
services, or facilities on behalf of a ballot question committee,
including, for the purpose of receiving a lower rate on advertisements,
the broadcast of advertisements which were produced by the ballot
question committee but paid for by the candidate committee. This
subdivision shall not prohibit a candidate or candidate committee from
expressing a position or opinion in support of or in opposition to a
ballot question or initiative or referendum petition.
Sec. 2. Original section 49-1446.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-2-

LB1018 LB1018
2026 2026
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-